Texas statutes.
OCCUPATIONS CODE

TITLE 3. HEALTH PROFESSIONS

SUBTITLE J. PHARMACY AND PHARMACISTS

CHAPTER 558. LICENSE TO PRACTICE PHARMACY

SUBCHAPTER A. LICENSE

Sec. 558.001. LICENSE REQUIRED. (a) A person may not practice pharmacy unless the person holds a license to practice pharmacy under this subtitle.

(b) A person may not:

(1) impersonate a pharmacist; or

(2) use the title "Registered Pharmacist" or "R.Ph.," or words of similar intent, unless the person is licensed to practice pharmacy in this state.

(c) A person may not dispense or distribute prescription drugs unless the person:

(1) is a pharmacist; or

(2) is otherwise authorized by this subtitle to dispense or distribute prescription drugs.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 558.002. UNAUTHORIZED ACQUISITION OF LICENSE. A person may not:

(1) impersonate before the board an applicant applying for a license under this subtitle; or

(2) acquire, with the intent to fraudulently acquire the license, a license in a manner other than the manner provided by this subtitle.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

SUBCHAPTER B. LICENSING BY EXAMINATION

Sec. 558.051. QUALIFICATIONS FOR LICENSE BY EXAMINATION. (a) To qualify for a license to practice pharmacy, an applicant for licensing by examination must submit to the board:

(1) a license fee set by the board; and

(2) a completed application on a form prescribed by the board with satisfactory sworn evidence that the applicant:

(A) is at least 18 years of age;

(B) has completed a minimum of a 1,000-hour internship or other program that has been approved by the board or has demonstrated, to the board's satisfaction, experience in the practice of pharmacy that meets or exceeds the board's minimum internship requirements;

(C) has graduated and received a professional practice degree, as defined by board rule, from an accredited pharmacy degree program approved by the board;

(D) has passed the examination required by the board; and

(E) has not had a pharmacist license granted by another state restricted, suspended, revoked, or surrendered, for any reason.

(b) Each applicant must obtain practical experience in the practice of pharmacy concurrent with college attendance or after college graduation, or both, under conditions the board determines.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 485 (H.B. 2561), Sec. 14, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 558.052. CONTENT, PREPARATION, AND VALIDATION OF EXAMINATION. (a) The board shall determine the content and subject matter of a licensing examination.

(b) The examination shall be prepared to measure the competence of the applicant to practice pharmacy.

(c) The board may employ and cooperate with an organization or consultant in preparing an appropriate examination.

(d) A written examination prepared or offered by the board, including a standardized national examination, must be validated by an independent testing professional.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 558.053. GRADING OF EXAMINATION. (a) The board may employ and cooperate with an organization or consultant in grading the examination.

(b) The board shall determine whether an applicant has passed the examination. The board has sole discretion and responsibility for that determination.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 558.054. FREQUENCY OF OFFERING EXAMINATION. The board shall give the examination at least two times during each state fiscal year.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 558.055. FAILURE TO PASS; REEXAMINATION. (a) An applicant who on the applicant's first attempt fails the examination may take the examination four additional times.

(b) Before an applicant who has failed the examination five times is allowed to retake the examination, the applicant must provide documentation from a college of pharmacy that the applicant has successfully completed additional college course work in each examination subject area the applicant failed.

(c) If requested in writing by a person who fails the examination, the board shall furnish the person with an analysis of the person's performance on the examination.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 599 (S.B. 460), Sec. 6, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 558.056. NOTIFICATION. The board shall notify each person taking an examination of the results of the examination not later than the 30th day after the date the board receives the results from a national testing service if the board uses a national testing service.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 558.057. INTERNSHIP OR OTHER PROGRAM TO QUALIFY FOR EXAMINATION. (a) In this section, "preceptor" means a pharmacist licensed in this state to practice pharmacy or another health care professional who meets the preceptor requirements specified by rule and who is recognized by the board to supervise and be responsible for the activities and functions of a pharmacist-intern in an internship program.

(b) The board shall:

(1) establish standards for an internship or other program necessary to qualify an applicant for the licensing examination; and

(2) determine the qualifications necessary for a preceptor used in the program.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1345 (S.B. 410), Sec. 13, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 558.058. ACCESSIBILITY OF EXAMINATION. The board by rule shall ensure that an examination under this subchapter is administered to applicants with disabilities in compliance with the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (42 U.S.C. Section 12101 et seq.).

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1345 (S.B. 410), Sec. 14, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 558.059. EXAMINATION FEE REFUND. (a) The board may retain all or part of an examination fee paid by an applicant who is unable to take the examination.

(b) The board shall adopt policies allowing the board to refund the examination fee paid by an applicant who:

(1) provides advance notice of the applicant's inability to take the examination; or

(2) is unable to take the examination because of an emergency.

(c) The board's policy must establish the required notification period and the emergencies that warrant a refund.

(d) The board shall make efforts to ensure that the policy does not conflict with the policy of a national testing body involved in administering the examination.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1345 (S.B. 410), Sec. 15, eff. September 1, 2005.

SUBCHAPTER C. LICENSING BY RECIPROCITY

Sec. 558.101. QUALIFICATIONS FOR LICENSE BY RECIPROCITY.

(a) To qualify for a license to practice pharmacy, an applicant for licensing by reciprocity must:

(1) submit to the board:

(A) a reciprocity fee set by the board; and

(B) a completed application in the form prescribed by the board, given under oath;

(2) have graduated and received a professional practice degree, as defined by board rule, from an accredited pharmacy degree program approved by the board;

(3) have presented to the board:

(A) proof of current or initial licensing by examination; and

(B) proof that the current license and any other license granted to the applicant by another state has not been restricted, suspended, revoked, or surrendered for any reason; and

(4) pass the Texas Pharmacy Jurisprudence examination.

(b) An applicant is not eligible for licensing by reciprocity unless the state in which the applicant is currently or was initially licensed as a pharmacist grants reciprocal licensing to pharmacists licensed by examination in this state, under like circumstances and conditions.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1345 (S.B. 410), Sec. 16, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 485 (H.B. 2561), Sec. 15, eff. September 1, 2017.

SUBCHAPTER D. PROVISIONAL AND TEMPORARY LICENSING

Sec. 558.151. QUALIFICATIONS FOR PROVISIONAL LICENSE. (a) The board may grant a provisional license to practice pharmacy to an applicant licensed in another state who seeks a license in this state. An applicant for a provisional license under this section must:

(1) pay a fee set by the board;

(2) be licensed in good standing as a pharmacist in another state that has professional standards and licensing requirements that the board considers to be substantially equivalent to the requirements of this subtitle;

(3) have passed a national or other examination recognized by the board relating to pharmacy; and

(4) be sponsored by a person licensed under this subtitle with whom the provisional license holder may practice under this subchapter.

(b) The board may waive the requirement of Subsection (a)(4) for an applicant if the board determines that compliance with that subsection constitutes a hardship to the applicant.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 558.152. DURATION OF PROVISIONAL LICENSE. A provisional license is valid until the date the board approves or denies the license application under this subtitle.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 558.153. PROCESSING OF LICENSE APPLICATION. The board must complete the processing of a provisional license holder's application for a license not later than the 180th day after the date the provisional license is issued or at the time licenses are issued following the successful completion of the examination, whichever date is later.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 558.154. ISSUANCE OF LICENSE TO PROVISIONAL LICENSE HOLDER. The board shall issue a license to practice pharmacy under this subtitle to the holder of a provisional license if:

(1) the provisional license holder passes the jurisprudence examination required under this subtitle;

(2) the board verifies that the provisional license holder has the academic and experience requirements for a license to practice pharmacy under this subtitle; and

(3) the provisional license holder satisfies all other requirements for a license to practice pharmacy under this subtitle.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 558.155. TEMPORARY LICENSE. The board by rule may provide for the issuance of a temporary license.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

SUBCHAPTER E. CERTAIN PROHIBITED PRACTICES

Sec. 558.201. DUPLICATING LICENSE OR CERTIFICATE. Except as expressly provided under this subtitle, a person may not in any manner duplicate a license to practice pharmacy or a license renewal certificate.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 558.202. FALSE AFFIDAVIT. A person who falsely makes the affidavit prescribed by Section 558.051 or 558.101 is guilty of fraudulent and dishonorable conduct and malpractice.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.